Nebraska, session 109, LB728.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB728 LB728
2026 2026
Section 1. For purposes of sections 1 to 3 of this act:
(1) Company means a publicly traded for-profit corporation, limited
liability company, partnership, or other business entity that is
organized or created under the laws of this state, has its principal
place of business in this state, or is a foreign entity that has made a
company proposal to become a domestic entity, whether by merger,
conversion, or otherwise;
(2) Company proposal means any proposal made by a company to its
shareholders that is included in the company's proxy statement including,
but not limited to, director nominations or elections, or any proposal
relating to director nominations or elections, executive compensation,
corporate transactions, corporate structure, auditor selection, or
company policy on any subject;
(3) Default recommendation or policy means a system, set of rules,
principles, or guidelines designed to assist with voting decisions on any
company proposals or proxy proposals;
(4) Proxy advisor means a person who provides a proxy advisory
service for compensation to shareholders of a company or to other persons
with authority to vote on behalf of shareholders of a company;
(5) Proxy advisory service means any of the following services that
are provided in connection with or in relation to a company or are
provided to any person in this state:
(a) Advice or a recommendation on how to vote on a company proposal
or proxy proposal;
(b) Proxy statement research and analysis regarding a company
proposal or proxy proposal; or
(c) Development of proxy voting recommendations or policies
including establishing default recommendations or policies;
(6) Proxy proposal means any proposal made by a shareholder of a
company that is included in the company's proxy statement including, but
not limited to, a proposal relating to any of the subjects that could be
-2-

LB728 LB728
2026 2026
covered by a company proposal;
(7) Shareholder includes a shareholder, unitholder, limited partner,
or other equity owner of a company; and
(8) Written financial analysis means a written document that:
(a) Analyzes the expected short-term and long-term financial
benefits and costs to the company of implementing a company proposal or
proxy proposal;
(b) Concludes what vote or course of action is most likely to
positively affect shareholder value; and
(c) Explains the methods and processes used to prepare the analysis
including the experience and geographic location of the personnel who
formed the recommendation.
Sec. 2. (1) If a proxy advisor makes a recommendation against
company management on a company proposal or proxy proposal or makes a
default recommendation or policy involving votes against company
management on company proposals or proxy proposals and the proxy advisor
does not do so based on a written financial analysis, the proxy advisor
shall:
(a) Concurrently with providing the proxy advisory service, include
a clear and conspicuous disclosure to each shareholder, or entity or
other person acting on behalf of a shareholder receiving the proxy
advisory service that:
(i) Identifies the service being provided;
(ii) Identifies the recommendation or policy at issue; and
(iii) States that the proxy advisory service has made the
recommendation or policy without doing so based on a written financial
analysis regarding the impact of that recommended action on company
investors that:
(A) Analyzes the expected short-term and long-term financial
benefits and costs to the company of implementing the company proposal or
proxy proposal;
-3-

LB728 LB728
2026 2026
(B) Concludes what vote or course of action is most likely to
positively affect shareholder value; and
(C) Explains the methods and processes used to prepare the analysis,
including the experience and geographic location of the personnel who
formed the recommendation;
(b) For a proxy advisory service described in subdivision (5)(a) or
(b) of section 1 of this act, concurrently with providing the proxy
advisory service, provide the disclosure under subdivision (1)(a) of this
section to the board of directors of each company that is the subject of
the service; and
(c) While any proxy advisory services described in this subsection
are being provided, publicly and conspicuously disclose on the home or
front page of the proxy advisor's website a statement that the advisor's
proxy advisory services include one or more services that involve
recommendations or policies against company management on company
proposals or proxy proposals that are not made based on a written
financial analysis regarding the impact of that recommended action on
company investors that:
(i) Analyzes the expected short-term and long-term financial
benefits and costs to the company of implementing the company proposal or
proxy proposal;
(ii) Concludes what vote or course of action is most likely to
positively affect shareholder value; and
(iii) Explains the methods and processes used to prepare the
analysis, including the experience and geographic location of the
personnel who formed the recommendation.
(2) If a proxy advisor makes a recommendation against company
management on a company proposal or proxy proposal, or makes a default
recommendation or policy involving votes against company management on
company proposals or proxy proposals, and the proxy advisor does so based
on a written financial analysis, the proxy advisor shall:
-4-

LB728 LB728
2026 2026
(a) Concurrently with providing the proxy advisory service, include
a clear and conspicuous disclosure to each shareholder, or entity or
other person acting on behalf of a shareholder, receiving the proxy
advisory service that:
(i) Identifies the service being provided;
(ii) Identifies the recommendation or policy at issue;
(iii) States that the proxy advisory service has made the
recommendation or policy based on a written financial analysis that:
(A) Analyzes the expected short-term and long-term financial
benefits and costs to the company of implementing the company proposal or
proxy proposal;
(B) Concludes what vote or course of action is most likely to
positively affect shareholder value; and
(C) Explains the methods and processes used to prepare the analysis,
including the experience and geographic location of the personnel who
formed the recommendation; and
(iv) States that the analysis is available upon request;
(b) Make such analysis available within a reasonable time to any
client of the proxy advisory service upon request; and
(c) For a proxy advisory service described in subdivision (5)(a) or
(b) of section 1 of this act, concurrently with providing the proxy
advisory service, provide a copy of such analysis to the board of
directors of each company that is the subject of the service.
Sec. 3. (1) A violation of section 2 of this act constitutes a
deceptive trade practice under the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act
and is subject to any remedies or penalties available for a violation
under the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act. The Attorney General may
exercise all investigative powers under the Uniform Deceptive Trade
Practices Act if the Attorney General has reason to believe a violation
has occurred, is occurring, or is about to occur.
(2) In addition to enforcement under subsection (1) of this section,
-5-

LB728 LB728
2026 2026
any person aggrieved by a violation of section 2 of this act may bring a
civil action seeking a declaratory judgment or injunctive relief against
a proxy advisor who violates such section. Not later than the seventh day
after the date on which an action is brought under this subsection, such
person shall provide written notice to the Attorney General, who has a
right to intervene in the action.
(3) For purposes of this section, an aggrieved person includes:
(a) A recipient of proxy advisory services provided by the proxy
advisor; and
(b) A company, or any shareholder of such company, that is the
subject of proxy advisory services described in subdivision (5)(a) or (b)
of section 1 of this act provided by the proxy advisor.
-6-